Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1899YH (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 195 Section 1. Section 481A.1, subsection 20, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 20. âFur-bearing animalsâ means the following , which 3 are declared to be fur-bearing animals for the purpose of 4 regulation and protection under the Code: black bear, beaver, 5 badger, mink, otter, muskrat, raccoon, skunk, opossum, spotted 6 skunk or civet cat, weasel, coyote, bobcat, wolf, groundhog, 7 red fox, and gray fox. This chapter does not apply to 8 domesticated fur-bearing animals. 9 Sec. 2. Section 481A.130, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 10 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. For each black bear, elk, antelope, buffalo, or moose, 12 two thousand five hundred dollars. 13